tmp/apertium-byv.byv.twoc
Alphabet 

 a ǎ â b c ç d ɛ e é ə f g h i ı j k l m n ŋ o ô ɔ p q r s t u ú v w x y z ɑ ʉ 
 A Ǎ Â B C Ç D Ɛ E É Ə F G H   I J K L M N Ŋ O Ô Ɔ P Q R S T U Ú V W X Y Z Ɑ Ʉ 

̀
́
̂
̌

%<v%> %<consec%> 
%<n%> %<pos%>
%<cl1%> %<cl3%> %<cl4%> %<cl5%> %<cl6%>

%[%+n%]:0
%[%+nasal%]:0
%[%+xp1%]:0
%[%+past1%]:0

; 

Sets 

Verb = %<v%>  ; 

Rules

"Nasalisation I"
%[%+n%]:0 /<= _  ;
   except
       _ (:*) %[%+nasal%]:0 ; 

"Nasalisation II"
%[%+nasal%]:0 /<= _  ;
   except 
       %[%+n%]:0 (:*) _  ;

"Floating high tone in past I I"
%[%+xp1%]:0 /<= _  ;
   except
       _ (:*) %[%+past1%]:0 ; 

"Floating high tone in past I II"
%[%+past1%]:0 /<= _  ;
   except 
       %[%+xp1%]:0 (:*) _  ;
